Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2612
Student-athlete's right to cancel.

(1) A student-athlete
may cancel an agency contract by giving notice of the cancellation to the
athlete agent in a record within fourteen days after the contract is signed.

(2) A student-athlete
may not waive the right to cancel an agency contract.

(3) If a student-athlete cancels
an agency contract, the student-athlete is not required to pay any consideration
under the contract or to return any consideration received from the athlete
agent to induce the student-athlete to enter into the contract.

Laws 2009, LB292, § 12.